District of Columbia statutes.
25-764

Advertisements related to alcoholic beverages in general.

No person shall publish or disseminate, or cause to be published or disseminated, directly or indirectly, through any radio or television broadcast, in any newspaper, magazine, periodical, or other publication, or by any sign, placard, or any printed matter, an advertisement of alcoholic beverages which is not in conformity with this title.

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959